Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2127
Practice of social work; certificate required; exceptions.

The requirement to be certified as a social worker pursuant to the Uniform Credentialing Act in order to represent himself or herself as a social worker shall not be construed to prevent:

(1) Qualified members of other professions, including, but not limited to, licensed physicians, registered or licensed practical nurses, attorneys, marriage and family therapists, psychologists, psychotherapists, vocational guidance counselors, school psychologists, members of the clergy, court employees, or other persons credentialed under the Uniform Credentialing Act from doing work consistent with the scope of practice of their respective professions, except that such qualified members shall not hold themselves out to the public by title as being engaged in the practice of social work; or

(2) The activities and services of a student or intern in social work practice who is pursuing a course of study in an approved educational program if the activities and services constitute a part of his or her supervised course of study or experience for certification and are performed under the supervision of a certified master social worker and the person is identified by an appropriate title as a social work student or intern. For purposes of this subdivision, supervision means that written records of services or procedures are examined and evaluative interviews are conducted relative thereto by a certified master social worker.

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 13;

Laws 1987, LB 473, § 31;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 71-1,256;

Laws 1993, LB 669, § 37;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,318;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 744.